California, session 20252026, AB2373.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Climate change is reshaping California’s coast, driving sea level rise, stronger storm surges, increased flooding and coastal erosion, and habitat loss. These changes put public health and safety, critical infrastructure, homes and communities, public access, and coastal economies and ecosystems at risk.(b) Senate Bill 272 (Chapter 384 of the Statutes of 2023) requires local governments lying, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone and local governments within the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission to develop sea level rise adaptation plans by 2034 and to seek approval of these plans from the state.(c) In 2024, the Ocean Protection Council published the “State of California Sea Level Rise Science Guidance,” providing the best available science to guide state and local decision­making based on likely projections, ranging from 6.1 feet to 11.9 feet, in the highest risk scenario, of sea rise impact along California’s coastline by 2150.(d) In 2025, the California Coastal Commission developed a white paper outlining the neighborhood-scale approach to coastal planning and held a public workshop to solicit stakeholder input.(e) It is of utmost importance to support the development and advancement of tools to provide local flexibility for coastal adaptation planning while also maintaining consistent statewide application of the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of the Public Resources Code).SEC. 2. Section 30501.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:30501.5. (a) A local government lying, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone may include a neighborhood-scale adaptation approach when including land use policies and implementation measures in their local coastal program or a sea level rise plan, pursuant to Section 30985, for that portion of the coastal zone within its jurisdiction. provided that the commission finds the policies and standards to be consistent with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).(b) A neighborhood-scale adaptation approach pursuant to subdivision (a) may include, but is not limited to, both of the following:(1) The identification of areas or assets, including, but not limited to, a neighborhood or developed area, beach area, protected coastal resource area, site, or area with infrastructure or assets, that are subject to this approach. The identified areas may be of different types and sizes, including, but not limited to, a long stretch of rural coastline, a single beach, an area of development, a hydrologic feature or watershed, or a specific facility.(2) Policies that reflect the shared planning features and specific, specific preferred adaptation strategies intended to minimize, mitigate, or avoid coastal impacts for different areas or development types based on the geophysical and land use characteristics. The strategies shall prioritize the use of nature-based solutions, including, but not limited to, beach and dune restoration, living shorelines, coastal wetland restoration, flood plain reconnection, and managed retreat.(c) This section shall be implemented consistent with Sections 30500 and 30985.(d) For purposes of this section, “neighborhood-scale adaptation approach” means an approach that allows local governments to identify and develop adaptation strategies that are specific to defined areas or assets within the jurisdiction of a local government that share characteristics, including geologic, land use, or other shared characteristics of an area, for focused adaptation planning to minimize and mitigate potential impacts associated with sea level rise.